District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.171

Subpoena power.

The District of Columbia Auditor may subpoena witnesses, compel the attendance and testimony of witnesses, and require the production of any records, including books, papers, documents, and any other evidence relating to any matter under investigation by the District of Columbia Auditor.

History

Apr. 22, 2004, D.C. Law 15-146, § 2, 51 DCR 2597

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-301.172.